District of Columbia statutes.
8-107.03

Seller’s burden in civil action.

Concerning a civil action against the seller for injuries resulting from violations of this subchapter, a seller has the burden of proving that the cleaning agent complies with § 8-107.02.

History

Mar. 25, 1986, D.C. Law 6-98, § 4, 33 DCR 723
Feb. 24, 1987, D.C. Law 6-192, § 6, 33 DCR 7836

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 6-973.